Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0045.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 17d. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 752 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 752.802 Property H Manufacture or sale of slugs for use in vending machines 5 752.811 Property H Breaking and entering a coin operated device 3 752.861 Person G Careless discharge of firearm causing injury or death 2 752.881 Person G Reckless use of bow and arrow resulting in injury or death 2 752.1003 Property F False claim, statement, or representation to obtain health care benefits 4 752.1004 Property F Soliciting, paying, or receiving kickback or receiving referral fee for health care payment 4 752.1005 Property H Conspiring to commit health care fraud 10 752.1006 Property D Health care fraud ? subsequent offense 20 752.1054(2) Property G Copying audio or video recordings for gain 5 752.1084 Property E Organized retail crime act violation 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 752.1101(3) Pub ord G Illegal entry into this state ? second or subsequent offense 2 752.1102(3) Pub ord D Entry after removal, deportation, or certain criminal convictions 10 752.1102(4) Pub ord B Entry after removal subsequent to felony conviction 20 752.1103 Pub ord B Refusal to comply with removal order based on certain charge or conviction 20 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 44 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.